test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Num-kuin_gt-norm.yaml
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Abs:куинь
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom:куинь
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc:куинез
#    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc+Dial/North:куиньты
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen:куиньлэн
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl:куиньлэсь
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat:куиньлы
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ins:куинен
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe:куиньтэк
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Advl:куинья
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine:куиньын
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill:куине
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela:куиньысь
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr:куиньысен
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter:куинёзь
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl:куинетӥ
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr:куиньлань

    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom:куиньёс
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc: [куиньёсыз, куиньёсты]
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen:куиньёслэн
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl:куиньёслэсь
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat:куиньёслы
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ins:куиньёсын
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe:куиньёстэк
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Advl:куиньёсъя
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine:куиньёсын
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill:куиньёсы
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela:куиньёсысь
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr:куиньёсысен
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter:куиньёсозь
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl:куиньёстӥ
    куинь+Num+Der/Этӥ+Det+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr:куиньёслань
